ani_misc.lexd
#-----------CONJUNCTIONS-----------

PATTERN Conjunction
Independents [<conj>:]
Particles
(Noun|Numeral|AdverbAdjective|Verb|Pronoun) Particles

LEXICON Independents        # по салимову
йа                          # или
йальи                       # или
йалъибор                    # или
во                          # и
амма                        # но
ссу                         # не
реху                        # же
гьарим                      # обращение
могур

LEXICON Particles
<evid>:гъодду               # из евангелия и Салимова
<evid>:лъоди                # из кайе
<evid>:гъоди                # из кайе
<conj>:ло                   # и
<conj>:но                   # и
<prt>:гу                    # же
<prt>:гуло
<prt>:реху
<prt>:де                    # вопросительные частицы
<prt>:ле
<prt>:не
<prt>:гуда
<prt>:гуле
<prt>:ди
<prt>:гъи
<prt>:дехъен                # сомнение
<prt>:лехъен
<prt>:нехъен
<prt>:ли[v]
<prt>:зиле[v]               # риторический вопрос
<prt>:йа[v]                 # повторение вопроса
<prt>:логу[n,p]             # совместность
<prt>:ногу[n,p]
<prt>:агьйа                 # утвердительность
<prt>:бу
<prt>:гьу
<prt>:ссуб[n,p]             # отстутствие
<prt>:тигу[n,p]
<prt>:гагу                  # сравнение
<prt>:гасси
<prt>:къгасси
<prt>:къга                  # количество
<prt>:лакъга[n]             # до 
<prt>:къгон                 # мест направления
<prt>:ххардду
<prt>:лоло[n]               # ради
<prt>:лъо[n]                # должность
<prt>:гъиб[p,n]             # же
<prt>:кІоб[p,n]
<prt>:жа[p,n]
<prt>:ла[p,n]
<prt>:на[p,n]
<prt>:лъи[p,n]              # то
<prt>:лъиболло[p,n]         # хотя
<prt>:боло
<prt>:моло
<prt>:вукІоболло[p]
<prt>:бикъболло[p]
<prt>:чІчІало[n]            # ради
